Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections
8-2101 to 8-2108 shall be known and may be cited as the Interstate Branching and Merger Act.

Laws 1997, LB 351, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 14.